Indiana, session 2026, HB1142.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-9-78 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 78. Uniform City Food and Beverage Tax
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to any city that is not required or
authorized to impose a food and beverage tax under any other
chapter of this article. A city that imposes a food and beverage tax
under this chapter may not also impose a food and beverage tax
under another chapter.
Sec. 2. The definitions in IC 6-2.5, IC 6-9-12-1, and IC 36-1-2
apply throughout this chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "food and beverage tax" refers
to a tax imposed under this chapter.
Sec. 4. (a) A city fiscal body may adopt an ordinance, in the
form prescribed by the department of state revenue, to impose an
excise tax on the transactions described in section 5 of this chapter.
(b) A city fiscal body may adopt an ordinance under this section
2026 IN 1142—LS 6770/DI 129


at a public hearing only after the municipal fiscal body has
previously held at least two (2) other separate public hearings
concerning the proposed food and beverage tax. The city fiscal
body must allow public comments and testimony concerning the
proposed food and beverage tax at each of the three (3) public
hearings.
(c) If a city fiscal body adopts an ordinance under this section,
the city fiscal body shall immediately send a certified copy of the
ordinance to the department of state revenue.
(d) If a city fiscal body adopts an ordinance under this section,
the food and beverage tax applies to transactions that occur after
the later of the following:
(1) The day specified in the ordinance.
(2) The last day of the month that succeeds the month in
which the ordinance is adopted.
Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), a food and
beverage tax applies to any transaction in which food or beverage
is furnished, prepared, or served:
(1) for consumption at a location, or on equipment, provided
by a retail merchant;
(2) in the city in which the tax is imposed; and
(3) by a retail merchant for consideration.
(b) Transactions described in subsection (a)(1) include
transactions in which food or beverage is:
(1) served by a retail merchant off the merchant's premises;
(2) sold in a heated state or heated by a retail merchant;
(3) two (2) or more food ingredients mixed or combined by a
retail merchant for sale as a single item (other than food that
is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller, and eggs,
fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal
foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by
the federal Food and Drug Administration in chapter 3,
subpart 3-401.11 of its Food Code so as to prevent food borne
illnesses); or
(4) food sold with eating utensils provided by a retail
merchant, including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses,
cups, napkins, or straws (for purposes of this subdivision, a
plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food).
(c) The food and beverage tax does not apply to the furnishing,
preparing, or serving of any food or beverage in a transaction that
is exempt, or to the extent exempt, from the state gross retail tax
2026 IN 1142—LS 6770/DI 129


imposed by IC 6-2.5.
Sec. 6. A food and beverage tax imposed under this chapter is in
addition to any county food and beverage tax imposed under this
article in the city.
Sec. 7. A food and beverage tax under this chapter is imposed on
the gross retail income received by a retail merchant from a
transaction described in section 5 of this chapter at a rate specified
in the ordinance adopted under section 4 of this chapter. The tax
rate:
(1) must be imposed in increments of twenty-five hundredths
percent (0.25%); and
(2) may not exceed one percent (1%).
Sec. 8. For purposes of this chapter, the gross retail income
received by the retail merchant from a transaction that is subject
to the food and beverage tax does not include the following:
(1) The amount of tax imposed on the transaction under
IC 6-2.5.
(2) The amount of tax imposed on the transaction by a county
under this article, if any.
Sec. 9. A food and beverage tax is imposed, paid, and collected
in the same manner that the state gross retail tax is imposed, paid,
and collected under IC 6-2.5. However, the return that must be
filed for the payment of the food and beverage tax under this
chapter may be made separately or may be combined with the
return filed for the payment of the state gross retail tax, as
prescribed by the department.
Sec. 10. The treasurer of state shall pay monthly the amounts
received from the tax imposed under this chapter to the city fiscal
officer upon warrants issued by the state comptroller.
Sec. 11. (a) If a city fiscal body imposes a tax under this chapter,
the city fiscal officer shall establish a uniform food and beverage
tax fund.
(b) The city fiscal officer shall deposit in the uniform food and
beverage tax fund all amounts received by the state comptroller
under this chapter.
(c) Any money earned from the investment of money in the fund
becomes a part of the fund.
Sec. 12. (a) Money in the uniform food and beverage tax fund
may be used by the city, after appropriation by the city fiscal body,
only for the following purposes:
(1) Capital improvements that promote economic
development in the city, including fairgrounds, convention
2026 IN 1142—LS 6770/DI 129


centers, or conference centers.
(2) Any:
(A) acquisition of land or interests in land;
(B) site improvements, infrastructure improvements,
buildings, structures, machinery, equipment, furnishings,
facilities, substance removal or remedial action, or other
costs;
(C) architectural, engineering, consultant, financial
advisory, and attorney's fees;
(D) incidental expenses in connection with the issuance and
sale of bonds;
(E) reserves for principal and interest;
(F) interest or insurance during construction; or
(G) debt service reserves or other credit enhancement;
that are necessary or useful for a capital improvement
described in subdivision (1) or the financing of the capital
improvement.
(3) Paying:
(A) the principal and interest of any bonds issued; and
(B) lease rental payments for a lease entered into;
for a purpose described in subdivisions (1) and (2).
(b) Money in the uniform food and beverage tax fund and
revenue from the food and beverage tax imposed under this
chapter may not be used to pay any operating expenses.
Sec. 13. A city may issue bonds or enter into leases to carry out
the purposes of this chapter. The city fiscal body may pledge
money in the city's uniform food and beverage tax fund and food
and beverage tax revenue under this chapter to pay bonds issued,
loans obtained, and lease payments or other obligations incurred
by or on behalf of the city for purposes of this chapter. A pledge
under this section is enforceable under IC 5-1-14. An action to
contest the validity of bonds issued or leases entered into under this
section must be brought within thirty (30) days after the adoption
of a bond ordinance or notice of the execution and approval of the
lease, as the case may be.
Sec. 14. (a) Subject to section 16 of this chapter, if a city has
outstanding obligations that are payable from the city's uniform
food and beverage tax, the fiscal body of the city may not reduce
the food and beverage tax rate below a rate that would produce
one and twenty-five hundredths (1.25) times the total of the highest
annual payment requirements from the food and beverage tax to
final maturity.
2026 IN 1142—LS 6770/DI 129


(b) For purposes of subsection (a), the determination of a tax
rate sufficient to produce one and twenty-five hundredths (1.25)
times the total of the highest annual payment requirements is based
on an average of the immediately preceding three (3) years of
collections for the food and beverage tax, if the tax has been
imposed for the preceding three (3) years. If the food and beverage
tax has not been imposed for the preceding three (3) years, the
fiscal body of the city may not reduce the rate below a rate that
would produce one and twenty-five hundredths (1.25) times the
total of the highest annual payment requirements, based upon a
study by a qualified accountant or financial adviser.
(c) If a city has no outstanding obligations that are payable from
a food and beverage tax imposed under this chapter, the fiscal body
of the city may adopt an ordinance to reduce the food and beverage
tax rate imposed under this chapter or to repeal the food and
beverage tax imposed under this chapter.
Sec. 15. The general assembly covenants with:
(1) each city imposing a food and beverage tax; and
(2) the purchasers and owners of obligations of a city payable
from a food and beverage tax;
that this chapter will not be repealed or amended in any manner
that will adversely affect the imposition or collection of a food and
beverage tax so long as the principal, interest, or lease rentals due
under those obligations of a city that are payable from a food and
beverage tax remain unpaid.
Sec. 16. A food and beverage tax imposed under this chapter
remains in effect until the earlier of:
(1) subject to section 15 of this chapter, the date on which the
city fiscal body rescinds the food and beverage tax; or
(2) the last day of the month beginning immediately after the
twenty-second anniversary of the date on which the food and
beverage tax was first imposed under this chapter in the city.
Sec. 17. The department of local government finance may not
reduce a city's property tax levy because the city receives revenue
from a food and beverage tax imposed under this chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 6-9-79 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 79. Uniform County Food and Beverage Tax
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to any county that is not required or
authorized to impose a food and beverage tax under any other
chapter of this article. A county that imposes a food and beverage
2026 IN 1142—LS 6770/DI 129


tax under this chapter may not also impose a food and beverage tax
under another chapter.
Sec. 2. The definitions in IC 6-2.5, IC 6-9-12-1, and IC 36-1-2
apply throughout this chapter.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "food and beverage tax" refers
to a tax imposed under this chapter.
Sec. 4. (a) A county fiscal body may adopt an ordinance, in the
form prescribed by the department of state revenue, to impose an
excise tax on the transactions described in section 5 of this chapter.
(b) A county fiscal body may adopt an ordinance under this
section at a public hearing only after the county fiscal body has
previously held at least two (2) other separate public hearings
concerning the proposed food and beverage tax. The county fiscal
body must allow public comments and testimony concerning the
proposed food and beverage tax at each of the three (3) public
hearings.
(c) If a county fiscal body adopts an ordinance under this
section, the county fiscal body shall immediately send a certified
copy of the ordinance to the department of state revenue.
(d) If a county fiscal body adopts an ordinance under this
section, the food and beverage tax applies to transactions that
occur after the later of the following:
(1) The day specified in the ordinance.
(2) The last day of the month that succeeds the month in
which the ordinance is adopted.
Sec. 5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), a food and
beverage tax applies to any transaction in which food or beverage
is furnished, prepared, or served:
(1) for consumption at a location, or on equipment, provided
by a retail merchant;
(2) in the county in which the tax is imposed; and
(3) by a retail merchant for consideration.
(b) Transactions described in subsection (a)(1) include
transactions in which food or beverage is:
(1) served by a retail merchant off the merchant's premises;
(2) sold in a heated state or heated by a retail merchant;
(3) two (2) or more food ingredients mixed or combined by a
retail merchant for sale as a single item (other than food that
is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller, and eggs,
fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal
foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by
the federal Food and Drug Administration in chapter 3,
2026 IN 1142—LS 6770/DI 129


subpart 3-401.11 of its Food Code so as to prevent food borne
illnesses); or
(4) food sold with eating utensils provided by a retail
merchant, including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses,
cups, napkins, or straws (for purposes of this subdivision, a
plate does not include a container or packaging used to
transport the food).
(c) The food and beverage tax does not apply to the furnishing,
preparing, or serving of any food or beverage in a transaction that
is exempt, or to the extent exempt, from the state gross retail tax
imposed by IC 6-2.5.
Sec. 6. A food and beverage tax imposed under this chapter is in
addition to any food and beverage tax imposed under this article
by a municipality.
Sec. 7. A food and beverage tax under this chapter is imposed on
the gross retail income received by a retail merchant from a
transaction described in section 5 of this chapter at a rate specified
in the ordinance adopted under section 4 of this chapter. The tax
rate:
(1) must be imposed in increments of twenty-five hundredths
percent (0.25%); and
(2) may not exceed one percent (1%).
Sec. 8. For purposes of this chapter, the gross retail income
received by the retail merchant from a transaction that is subject
to the food and beverage tax does not include the following:
(1) The amount of tax imposed on the transaction under
IC 6-2.5.
(2) The amount of tax imposed on the transaction by a
municipality under this article, if any.
Sec. 9. A food and beverage tax is imposed, paid, and collected
in the same manner that the state gross retail tax is imposed, paid,
and collected under IC 6-2.5. However, the return that must be
filed for the payment of the food and beverage tax under this
chapter may be made separately or may be combined with the
return filed for the payment of the state gross retail tax, as
prescribed by the department.
Sec. 10. The treasurer of state shall pay monthly the amounts
received from the tax imposed under this chapter to the county
fiscal officer upon warrants issued by the state comptroller.
Sec. 11. (a) If a county fiscal body imposes a tax under this
chapter, the county fiscal officer shall establish a uniform food and
beverage tax fund.
2026 IN 1142—LS 6770/DI 129


(b) The county fiscal officer shall deposit in the uniform food
and beverage tax fund all amounts received by the state
comptroller under this chapter.
(c) Any money earned from the investment of money in the fund
becomes a part of the fund.
Sec. 12. (a) Money in the uniform food and beverage tax fund
may be used by the county, after appropriation by the county fiscal
body, only for the following purposes:
(1) Capital improvements that promote economic
development in the county, including fairgrounds, convention
centers, or conference centers.
(2) Any:
(A) acquisition of land or interests in land;
(B) site improvements, infrastructure improvements,
buildings, structures, machinery, equipment, furnishings,
facilities, substance removal or remedial action, or other
costs;
(C) architectural, engineering, consultant, financial
advisory, and attorney's fees;
(D) incidental expenses in connection with the issuance and
sale of bonds;
(E) reserves for principal and interest;
(F) interest or insurance during construction; or
(G) debt service reserves or other credit enhancement;
that are necessary or useful for a capital improvement
described in subdivision (1) or the financing of the capital
improvement.
(3) Paying:
(A) the principal and interest of any bonds issued; and
(B) lease rental payments for a lease entered into;
for a purpose described in subdivisions (1) and (2).
(b) Money in the uniform food and beverage tax fund and
revenue from the food and beverage tax imposed under this
chapter may not be used to pay any operating expenses.
Sec. 13. A county may issue bonds or enter into leases to carry
out the purposes of this chapter. The county fiscal body may pledge
money in the county's uniform food and beverage tax fund and
food and beverage tax revenue under this chapter to pay bonds
issued, loans obtained, and lease payments or other obligations
incurred by or on behalf of the county for purposes of this chapter.
A pledge under this section is enforceable under IC 5-1-14. An
action to contest the validity of bonds issued or leases entered into
2026 IN 1142—LS 6770/DI 129


under this section must be brought within thirty (30) days after the
adoption of a bond ordinance or notice of the execution and
approval of the lease, as the case may be.
Sec. 14. (a) Subject to section 16 of this chapter, if a county has
outstanding obligations that are payable from the county uniform
food and beverage tax, the fiscal body of the county may not reduce
the food and beverage tax rate below a rate that would produce
one and twenty-five hundredths (1.25) times the total of the highest
annual payment requirements from the food and beverage tax to
final maturity.
(b) For purposes of subsection (a), the determination of a tax
rate sufficient to produce one and twenty-five hundredths (1.25)
times the total of the highest annual payment requirements is based
on an average of the immediately preceding three (3) years
collections for the food and beverage tax, if the tax has been
imposed for the preceding three (3) years. If the food and beverage
tax has not been imposed for the preceding three (3) years, the
fiscal body of the county may not reduce the rate below a rate that
would produce one and twenty-five hundredths (1.25) times the
total of the highest annual payment requirements, based upon a
study by a qualified accountant or financial adviser.
(c) If a county has no outstanding obligations that are payable
from a food and beverage tax imposed under this chapter, the fiscal
body of the county may adopt an ordinance to reduce the food and
beverage tax rate imposed under this chapter or to repeal the food
and beverage tax imposed under this chapter.
Sec. 15. The general assembly covenants with:
(1) each county imposing a food and beverage tax; and
(2) the purchasers and owners of obligations of a county
payable from a food and beverage tax;
that this chapter will not be repealed or amended in any manner
that will adversely affect the imposition or collection of a food and
beverage tax so long as the principal, interest, or lease rentals due
under those obligations of a county that are payable from a food
and beverage tax remain unpaid.
Sec. 16. A food and beverage tax imposed under this chapter
remains in effect until the earlier of:
(1) subject to section 15 of this chapter, the date on which the
county fiscal body rescinds the food and beverage tax; or
(2) the last day of the month beginning immediately after the
twenty-second anniversary of the date on which the food and
beverage tax was first imposed under this chapter in the
2026 IN 1142—LS 6770/DI 129


county.
Sec. 17. The department of local government finance may not
reduce a county's property tax levy because the county receives
revenue from a food and beverage tax imposed under this chapter.
2026 IN 1142—LS 6770/DI 129